Hawaii statutes.
§235-9 Exemptions; generally. Except
as provided in sections 235-61 to 235-67 relating to withholding and collection
of tax at source, and section 235-2.4 relating to "unrelated business
taxable income", the following persons and organizations shall not be
taxable under this chapter: banks, building and loan associations, financial
services loan companies, financial corporations, small business investment
companies, trust companies, mortgage loan companies, financial holding
companies, subsidiaries of financial holding companies as defined in chapter
241, and development companies taxable under chapter 241; insurance companies,
agricultural cooperative associations, and fish marketing associations
exclusively taxable under other laws; and persons engaged in the business of
motion picture and television film production as defined by the director of
taxation. [L Sp 1957, c 1, pt of §2; am L 1965, c 224, §4; Supp, §121-6; HRS
§235-9; am L 1976, c 156, §7 and c 203, §4; am L 1979, c 62, §2(8); am L 1982,
c 92, §4; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 239, §1(10); am L 1989, c 266, §3; am L
1992, c 106, §2; am L 1997, c 107, §2]

Attorney General Opinions

Definitions of "marriage" and "spouse"
under the federal Defense of Marriage Act, Pub. L. No. 104-199, 110 Stat. 2419,
may preclude civil union partners of the same gender under the State's Civil
Union Act from filing jointly for federal income tax purposes, but they do not
preclude civil union partners from filing joint tax returns for Hawaii income
tax purposes. Att. Gen. Op. 11-2.

Case Notes

Exempting particular classes from income taxes does not
render law objectionable on grounds of inequality. 35 H. 855, aff'd 130 F.2d
786.

Exemption is grant of immunity where otherwise liable to
assessment. 35 H. 855, aff'd 130 F.2d 786.

Claims for exemption strictly construed. 36 H. 340.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next